Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.030

Poison information center—Statewide program.

The department shall, in a manner consistent with this chapter, provide support for the statewide program of poison and drug information services. These services shall, no later than June 30, 1993, be centralized in and coordinated by a single nonprofit center to be located in a place determined by the secretary. The services of this center shall be:

(1) Twenty-four hour emergency telephone management and treatment referral of victims of poisoning and overdose incidents, to include determining whether treatment can be accomplished at the scene of the incident or transport to an emergency treatment or other facility is required, and carrying out telephone follow-up to assure that adequate care is provided;

(2) Providing information to health professionals involved in management of poisoning and overdose victims;

(3) Coordination and development of community education programs designed to inform the public and members of the health professions of poison prevention and treatment methods and to improve awareness of poisoning and overdose problems, occupational risks, and environmental exposures; and

(4) Coordination of outreach units whose primary functions shall be to inform the public about poison problems and prevention methods, how to utilize the poison center, and other toxicology issues.

[ 1993 c 343 s 2; 1987 c 214 s 17; 1980 c 178 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.73.220.]